Utah statutes.
70A-3-108.   Payable on demand or at definite time.
(1)  A promise or order is "payable on demand" if it states that it is payable
on demand or at sight, or otherwise indicates that it is payable at the will
of the holder, or does not state any time of payment.
(2)  A promise or order is "payable at a definite time" if it is payable on
elapse of a definite period of time after sight or acceptance or at a fixed
date or dates or at a time or times readily ascertainable at the time the
promise or order is issued, subject to rights of prepayment, acceleration,
extension at the option of the holder, or extension to a further definite time
at the option of the maker or acceptor or automatically upon or after a
specified act or event.
(3)  If an instrument, payable at a fixed date, is also payable upon demand
made before the fixed date, the instrument is payable on demand until the
fixed date and, if demand for payment is not made before that date, becomes
payable at a definite time on the fixed date.
